District of Columbia statutes.
5-1301

Memorial fountain to members of Metropolitan Police Department.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to accept and maintain for the District of Columbia the gift of a memorial fountain to the members of the Metropolitan Police Department; provided, that the design and model of the memorial fountain are approved by the Commission of Fine Arts, and thereafter erected at a location to be approved by the Mayor of the District of Columbia and the National Capital Planning Commission on land now owned by the District of Columbia, for the Municipal Center.

Apr. 22, 1940, 54 Stat. 157, ch. 136
1981 Ed., § 4-1101.
1973 Ed., § 4-901.
The functions, powers and duties of the National Capital Park and Planning Commission were transferred to the National Capital Planning Commission by the Act of June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 9, as added by the Act of July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 790, ch. 949, § 1.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.